Mississippi, session 2026, SB2305.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The following shall be codified as Section 37-13-8.1, Mississippi Code of 1972: 37-13-8.1.  The school board of each school district shall allow a Christian Bible to be visible and accessible to students in each public school classroom and library.  For purposes of this section, any person or entity other than the school district may provide the Christian Bible to be kept in a public school classroom or library. SECTION 2.  Section 37-13-6, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 37-13-6.  (1)  The flag of the United States shall be displayed in close proximity to the school building, on a proper staff, at all times during the hours of daylight when the school is in session when the weather will permit without damage to the flag.  In addition, the flag of the United States shall be displayed in each classroom and in each principal room of the school building at all times while school is in session.  It shall be the duty of the school boards of each school district to provide for the flags, proper flag staffs and their proper display.  Each school district shall provide student instruction in the proper etiquette toward, correct display of, and respect for the flag, and in patriotic exercises.  The instruction shall be a part of the district's fifth-grade social studies curriculum or history curriculum, with the assistance of the State Department of Education. (2) * * *  From and after July 1, 2002,  (a)  The school boards of all public schools of this state shall require the teachers under their control to have all pupils repeat the * * * oath of allegiance Pledge of Allegiance to the flag of the United States of America at the beginning of the first hour of class each day school is in session, such * * * oath of allegiance Pledge of Allegiance being as follows: "I pledge allegiance to the flag of the United States of America, and to the Republic for which it stands, one nation under God, indivisible, with liberty and justice for all." (b)  Any student or teacher who objects to reciting the * * * oath of allegiance Pledge of Allegiance shall be excused from participating without penalty.  Whenever a teacher is excused, the school in which the teacher is employed must make alternate arrangements for the teacher's students to participate in the daily recitation of the Pledge of Allegiance. (3)  A person having knowledge of the failure of a school or teacher to comply with the requirements of this section may report the alleged violation to the local school board. If, upon inquiry, the school board verifies the noncompliance, the school board shall take such actions as may be necessary to ensure compliance with the requirements of this section. SECTION 3.  Section 37-13-7, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 37-13-7. * * *  (1)  The boards of trustees of the public schools of this state shall require the teachers under their control to have all pupils repeat the oath of allegiance to the flag of the United States of America at least once during each school month, such oath of allegiance being as follows: "I pledge allegiance to the flag of the United States of America, and to the Republic for which it stands, one nation under God, indivisible, with liberty and justice for all." (2) The official pledge of the State of Mississippi shall read as follows: "I salute the flag of Mississippi and the sovereign state for which it stands with pride in her history and achievements and with confidence in her future under the guidance of Almighty God." The pledge of allegiance to the Mississippi flag shall be taught in the public schools of this state, along with the pledge of allegiance to the United States flag. SECTION 4.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.